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PRE−CHECK
1.SRSWARNINGLIGHTCHECK
(a) Turn the ignition switch to the ACC or ON position and

check that the SRS warning light lights up.
(b) Check that the SRS warning light goes out after approx.

6 seconds.
HINT:
S Whenthe ignitionswitch isatACCorONand theSRS

warning light remainsONor flashes, theairbagsensor
assembly has detected a malfunction code.

S If, afterapprox.6secondshaveelapsed, theSRSwarn-
ing light sometimes lights up or the SRS warning light
lights up even when the ignition switch is OFF, a short in
the SRS warning light circuit can be considered likely.
Proceed to ”SRS warning light circuit malfunction” on
page DI−552, DI−554.

2. DTC CHECK (Using diagnosis check wire)
(a) Present Trouble Codes:

Output the DTC.
(1)Turn the ignitionswitch to theACCorONposition

and wait for approx. 20 seconds.
(2) Using SST, connect terminals Tc and E 1 of the

check connector.
SST09843 −18020

NOTICE:
Pay due attention to the terminal connecting position to
avoid a malfunction.
(b) Past Trouble Codes:

Output the DTC.
(1) Using SST, connect Terminals Tc and E 1 of the

check connector.
SST09843 −18020
(2) Turn the ignition switch to the ACC or ON position

and wait for approx. 20 seconds.
NOTICE:
Pay due attention to the terminal connecting position to
avoid a malfunction.
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(c) Read the DTC
Read the 2−digit DTC as indicated by the number of times
the SRS warning light blinks. As an example, the blinking
patterns, normal, 11 and 31 are shown in the illustration.

S Normal code indication
The light will blink 2 times per second.

S Malfunction code indication
The first blinking output indicates the first digit
of a 2−digit DTC. After a 1.5−second pause,
the second blinking output will indicate the
second digit.

S If there are 2 or more codes, there will be a 2.5−se-
cond pause between each code. After all the codes
have been output, there will be a 4.0−second pause
and they will all be repeated.

HINT:
S In the event of a number of trouble codes, indication will

start from the smallest numbered code.
S If aDTCisnotoutputoraDTCisoutputwithout terminal

connection,proceed to theTc terminal circuit inspection
on page DI−558.
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3.DTCCHECK(Usinghand −held tester)
(a)Hookup thehand −held tester to thecheckconnectoror

DLC3.
(b) Read the DTCs by following the prompts on the tester

screen.
HINT:
Please refer to thehand −held testeroperator’smanual for fur-
ther details.
4. DTC CLEARANCE (Not using service wire)
When the ignition switch is turned OFF, the diagnostic trouble
code iscleared.
5. DTC CLEARANCE (Using service wire)
(a) Connect the 2 service wires to terminals Tc and AB of

check connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait for approx.

6 seconds.
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(c) Starting with the Tc terminal, ground alternately terminal
Tcand terminalAB twiceeach incyclesof 1.0second.
Make sure that the terminals are grounded. Ensure the
terminal Tc remains grounded.

HINT:
When alternately grounding terminals Tc and AB, release
ground from one terminal and immediately ground the other ter-
minal within an interval of 0.2 seconds.
If DTCs are not cleared, repeat the above procedure until the
codes are cleared.

(d) Several seconds after doing the clearing procedure, the
SRS warning light will blink in a 50 msec. cycle to indicate
the codes which have been cleared.

6. Past Trouble Codes:
DTC CLEARANCE
(See step 5.)
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7. RELEASE METHOD OF AIRBAG ACTIVATION PRE-
VENTION MECHANISM

An airbag activation prevention mechanism is built into the con-
nector for the squib circuit of the SRS.
When release of the airbag activation prevention mechanism is
directed in the troubleshooting procedure, as shown in the il-
lustrations on the following pages, insert paper which has the
same thickness as the male terminal between the terminal and
the short spring.
CAUTION:
Never release the airbag activation prevention mechanism
unless specifically directed by the troubleshooting proce-
dure.
NOTICE:
If the inserted paper is too thick the terminal and short
spring may be damaged, so always use paper with the
same thickness as the male terminal.
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